District of Columbia statutes.
42-2111

Notice.

Pursuant to rules issued in accordance with § 42-2104, the Mayor shall give:

(1)

Reasonable advance notice to the record owners and affected parties of properties brought to tax sale in accordance with § 47-1205(b) and (c); and

(2)

Reasonable advance notice of properties scheduled to be sold and the date of sale by advertising the list of properties in a newspaper of general circulation published in the District of Columbia at least once every 2 weeks.

History

Aug. 9, 1986, D.C. Law 6-135, § 12, 33 DCR 3771

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-2711.